Hawaii statutes.
§287-41 Surrender of license on violation.
Any person whose license has been suspended as herein provided, or whose policy
of insurance or bond, when required under this chapter, has been canceled or
terminated, or who neglects to furnish other proof upon request of the
administrator shall immediately surrender the person's license to the
administrator. If any person fails to surrender to the administrator the
license as provided herein, the administrator shall forthwith direct any police
or other peace officer to secure possession thereof and return the same to the
administrator. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955, §160-119; HRS §287-41; am L
1980, c 84, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next